Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB568.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Notice and Removal of Nonconsenting Intimate Depictions Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affected individual." An individual who resides in this Commonwealth and has unauthorized or nonconsenting images of themselves in a state of nudity, undress or engaged in sexual conduct, as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 5903(e)(3) (relating to obscene and other sexual materials and performances)."Covered online platform." A public or semipublic Internet website, Internet-based service, social media platform, 123456789101112131415161718 application or mobile application that primarily provides a forum for user-generated content, including messages, videos, images, games and audio files."Depiction." A visual depiction or artificially generated sexual depiction, as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3131(g) (relating to unlawful dissemination of intimate image)."Social media platform." A public or semipublic Internet-based service or application that has users in this Commonwealth and that meets all of the following criteria:(1) A substantial function of the service or application is to connect users in order to allow users to interact socially with each other within the service or application.(2) The service or application allows users to do all of the following:(i) Construct a public or semipublic profile for purposes of signing into and using the service or application.(ii) Populate a list of other users with whom an individual shares a social connection within the system.(iii) Create or post content viewable by other users, including on message boards, in chat rooms or through a landing page or main feed that presents the user with content generated by other users.Section 3. Notification and removal.Upon notification from an affected individual, legal representative or an affected individual's parent or legal guardian, a covered online platform shall remove the reported depiction within 48 hours and make reasonable efforts to identify and remove each known identical copy of the depiction. A covered online platform shall:20250SB0568PN0557 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Have an Internet website for affected individuals to submit notification and request a depiction to be removed.(2) Provide on the platform a clear and conspicuous notice of the Internet website described in paragraph (1) for notification as described under paragraph (1).(3) Not be liable for any claim based on the covered platform's good faith disabling of access to, or removal of, material claimed to be a nonconsensual intimate visual depiction based on facts or circumstances from which the unlawful publishing of an intimate visual depiction is apparent, regardless of whether the intimate visual depiction is ultimately determined to be unlawful or not. It shall be a defense that the covered online platform made all reasonable attempts to remove the depiction as technology allows.Section 4. Applicability.An Internet service provider, a service or an application that provides email or direct messaging services or cloud computing shall not be considered to be a covered online platform solely on the basis of that function.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0568PN0557 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021